Utah statutes.
63D-2-104.   Posting certain information on a court website.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a court website:

(a)  may not display personally identifiable information; and

(b)  shall contain a conspicuous notice that includes a list of documents routinely posted on the court website.

(2)  This section does not prohibit access to any original document as provided by law.

(3)  This section does not apply to:

(a)  the Registry of Judgments created in Section 78B-5-201, if the Registry of Judgments complies with Subsection (3)(b);

(b)  remote access to a document through a network or system that:

(i)  is secure; and

(ii)  provides restricted access through security standards developed by the court, including a registration requirement under which a prospective user must provide the prospective user's:

(A)  identity;

(B)  business or residence address; and

(C)  citizenship status;

(c)  postings related to legitimate law enforcement purposes;

(d)  postings of documents filed or recorded more than 100 years prior to the posting;

(e)  postings of:

(i)  historical information;

(ii)  genealogical information;

(iii)  interpretive information about historic persons and events; or

(iv)  educational information about historic persons and events; or

(f)  postings of information instructing a user how to contact a website operator, employee, or other representative of the court.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

